Washington statutes.
RCW 19.85.011

Finding.

The legislature finds that administrative rules adopted by state agencies can have a disproportionate impact on the state's small businesses because of the size of those businesses. This disproportionate impact reduces competition, innovation, employment, and new employment opportunities, and threatens the very existence of some small businesses. The legislature therefore enacts the Regulatory Fairness Act with the intent of reducing the disproportionate impact of state administrative rules on small business.

[ 1994 c 249 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—Application—1994 c 249: See notes following RCW 34.05.310.